Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Licensing; Rabies Control Districts

§§ 11-31-201 through 11-31-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 124, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 27, §§ 1, 3 through 9, and 12, related to injurious and unlicensed dogs, dog control districts, reimbursements for loss of livestock, payment of warrants, and administration costs.

§ 11-31-211.
Property rights in unlicensed dog or cat; no right of action for
destruction.

The owner of a dog or
cat has no property right in an unlicensed dog or cat, nor does he
have any right of action against any person for the destruction of
the dog or cat.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 27, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 56-2211; W.S. 1957, § 11-594; W.S. 1977, § 11-36-211; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1992, ch. 72, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dog being deemed personal property and subject of larceny, see §

11-31-102

.

§ 11-31-212.
Rabies control districts; establishment; notice.

The board of county commissioners of any county may establish a rabies control district by resolution when in the judgment of the board and the county health officer a district is necessary. The resolution shall designate the boundaries of the district, which may include any incorporated city or town, and shall identify the district by name.

The resolution creating the rabies control district shall be published at least once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein the district is located.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-594.1; W.S. 1977, § 11-36-212; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-31-213.
Registration; vaccination certificate required.

The board of county commissioners
may require the registration of all dogs and cats within a rabies
control district and may require the owner or person having the right
to possession of any dog or cat in the district three (3) months of
age or older, to present a valid rabies vaccination certificate showing
the dog or cat has been vaccinated for immunization against rabies
by a licensed veterinarian as a condition for registration. The vaccination
certificate shall indicate the date of vaccination, the type of vaccine
used and the period of immunization.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-594.2; W.S. 1977, § 11-36-213; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1992, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 11-31-214.
Board authorized to adopt rules and regulations.

The board of county commissioners,
with the advice of the county health officer, state veterinarian and department of health, may adopt
such rules and regulations as necessary to implement the program for
registration and immunization of dogs and cats in the rabies control
district, including the requirement that registered dogs and cats
be tagged or marked in such manner as to make them readily identifiable.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-594.3; W.S. 1977, § 11-36-214; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1992, ch. 72, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “state veterinarian and department of health,” following “county health officers.”